Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 10
GENERAL PROVISIONS

27-10.5-1001. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part repealed, (SB 09-206), ch. 7, p. 59, § 1, effective March 2.

Editor's note:

This part 10 was added in 2008 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2009. For the text of this part 10 prior to 2009, consult the 2008 Colorado Revised Statutes.